District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0818.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
34 act may be cited as the “For-Hire Passenger Service Reform Act of 2026”.
35 Sec. 2. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by adding a new
36 chapter 28A to read as follows:
37 “CHAPTER 28A. FOR-HIRE VEHICLES.
38 “TABLE OF CONTENTS
39 “SUBCHAPTER I. GENERAL PROVISIONS. ................................................................ 3
40 “§ 47-2890.01. General Definitions. ............................................................................... 4
41 “§ 47-2890.02. For-hire passenger service defined. ....................................................... 9
42 “§ 47-2890.03. Classifications of for-hire passenger service. ...................................... 11
43 “§ 47-2890.04. Emerging markets. ............................................................................... 12
44 “§ 47-2890.05. Reciprocal agreements. ........................................................................ 14
45 “§ 47-2890.06. Insurance. ............................................................................................. 14
46 “§ 47-2890.07. General licensing provisions. ............................................................... 18
47 “SUBCHAPTER II. DISPATCH AND METER PROVIDERS. ..................................... 18
48 “§ 47-2891.01. Dispatch service defined. ..................................................................... 18
49 “§ 47-2891.02. Dispatch service provider license. ....................................................... 19
50 “§ 47-2891.03. Dispatch service provider requirements. ............................................. 21
51 “§ 47-2891.04. Smart meter system requirements. ....................................................... 23
52 “§ 47-2891.05. Operator agreements. ........................................................................... 25
53 “§ 47-2891.06. Operator payment and tips. .................................................................. 27
54 “§ 47-2891.07. Wheelchair-accessible trips – level of service standard. ..................... 27
55 “§ 47-2891.08. Maintenance of trip records. ................................................................ 29
56 “§ 47-2891.09. Data specifications. .............................................................................. 30
57 “§ 47-2891.10. Taxi stands and geofencing policy....................................................... 30
58 “§ 47-2891.11. Vehicle-miles travelled fee. ................................................................. 31
59 “SUBCHAPTER III. PASSENGER VEHICLES............................................................. 32
60 “§ 47-2892.01. Vehicle registration. ............................................................................. 32
61 “§ 47-2892.02. Uniform vehicle requirements. ............................................................ 33
62 “§ 47-2892.03. Vehicle safety inspection. .................................................................... 34
63 “§ 47-2892.05. Requirements of street hail vehicles. ................................................... 35
2

64 “§ 47-2892.06. Requirements of wheelchair-accessible vehicles. ................................ 37
65 “§ 47-2892.07. Vehicle fleet provider. ......................................................................... 37
66 “§ 47-2892.08. Vehicle lease agreements. .................................................................... 38
67 “§ 47-2892.09. Vehicle emblem and trade dress. ......................................................... 39
68 “SUBCHAPTER IV. OPERATORS. ............................................................................... 40
69 “§ 47-2893.01. Operator license. .................................................................................. 40
70 “§ 47-2893.02. Provisional operator license. ................................................................ 43
71 “§ 47-2893.03. Street hail operator endorsement. ........................................................ 44
72 “§ 47-2893.04. Wheelchair-accessible vehicle operator endorsement. ........................ 45
73 “§ 47-2893.05. Background check and driving history. ............................................... 46
74 “§ 47-2893.06. Suspension of operator license . .......................................................... 48
75 “SUBCHAPTER V. PASSENGER RIGHTS AND CONSUMER PROTECTION. ....... 49
76 “§ 47-2894.01. Fare structures. ..................................................................................... 49
77 “§ 47-2894.02. Street hail and accessible rate structures.............................................. 50
78 “§ 47-2894.03. Fare transparency. ................................................................................ 52
79 “§ 47-2894.04. Prohibition on surveillance-based fare discrimination. ....................... 53
80 “§ 47-2894.05. Accessibility and non-discrimination. ................................................. 54
81 “§ 47-2894.06. Underserved areas. ............................................................................... 56
82 “SUBCHAPTER VI. AGENCY ORGANIZATION. ...................................................... 57
83 “§ 47-2895.01. Department of For-Hire Vehicles – Established. ................................. 57
84 “§ 47-2895.02. Department of For-Hire Vehicles – Director. ...................................... 59
85 “§ 47-2895.03. Advisory Council. ................................................................................ 60
86 “§ 47-2895.04. For-Hire Industry Service Fund. .......................................................... 61
87 “§ 47-2895.05. Accessibility Advisory Committee. ..................................................... 62
88 “§ 47-2895.06. Accessible Passenger Service Fund. .................................................... 63
89 “SUBCHAPTER VII. ENFORCEMENT. ........................................................................ 64
90 “§ 47-2896.01. Complaint procedures. ......................................................................... 64
91 “§ 47-2896.02. Vehicle Inspection Officers. ................................................................ 65
92 “§ 47-2896.03. Cease-and-desist orders. ...................................................................... 66
93 “§ 47-2896.04. Immobilization and impoundment of a vehicle for hire. ..................... 67
94 “§ 47-2896.05. Construction. ........................................................................................ 69
95 “§ 47-2896.07. Fees and penalties. ............................................................................... 69
96
97 “SUBCHAPTER I. GENERAL PROVISIONS.
3

98 “§ 47-2890.01. General Definitions.
99 “For the purposes of this chapter, the term:
100 “(1) “Affiliated operator” means an operator providing for-hire passenger service
101 by utilizing services provided by a dispatch service provider.
102 “(2) “Affiliated vehicle” means a vehicle used to provide for-hire passenger
103 service in association with a dispatch service provider.
104 “(3) “Autonomous vehicle”, “autonomous driving system” and “autonomous
105 driving system manufacturer” shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 of the
106 Autonomous Vehicle Act of 2012, effective April 23, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-278; D.C. Official
107 Code § 50-2351).
108 “(4) “Base fare” means the fare charged to a passenger prior to the addition of any
109 fees, surcharges, or fare modifiers.
110 “(5) “Carpooling” means the transportation of one or more passengers on a trip to
111 which all of the following applies:
112 “(A) The transportation of the passengers is incidental to the main purpose
113 of the trip;
114 “(B) The transportation is not the result of soliciting for passengers by a
115 driver or any other person;
116 “(C) The consideration for the trip is limited to:
117 “(i) An undertaking by a passenger to carry the operator on a
118 similar trip on the same basis;
119 “(ii) The payment by a passenger of a share of the costs incurred in
120 making the trip, with neither the operator nor any other person making a profit from the trip.
4

121 “(6) “Charitable passenger service” means the transportation of one or more
122 passengers on a trip to which all of the following applies:
123 “(A) The main purpose of the trip is to carry the passengers;
124 “(B) The trip itself is made for or on behalf of:
125 “(i) A government entity; or
126 “(ii) A nonprofit entity, as part of its stated charitable work for
127 members of the public;
128 “(C) The operator receives no renumeration for the trip, except as
129 provided in sub-paragraph (D);
130 “(D) The consideration for the trip is limited to the payment, by a
131 passenger or the entity set forth in paragraph (B), of all or part of the costs incurred in making
132 the trip, with neither the operator nor any other person making, or intending to make, a profit
133 from the trip.
134 “(7) “Commercial AV fleet endorsement” shall have the same meaning as
135 established in section 2 of the Autonomous Vehicle Act of 2012, effective April 23, 2013 (D.C.
136 Law 19-278; D.C. Official Code § 50-2351).
137 “(8) “Costs incurred in making the trip” means the following costs specific to an
138 individual trip, or proportionally imputed to that trip:
139 “(A) Fuel costs;
140 “(B) Maintenance costs;
141 “(C) Parking costs;
142 “(D) Toll costs;
143 “(E) Insurance costs;
5

144 “(F) Vehicle depreciation; and
145 “(G) Any other cost determined by the Department.
146 “(9) “Customer” means the person requesting a pre-arranged for-hire passenger
147 service trip, regardless of whether the person is a passenger for that trip.
148 “(10) “Department” or “DFHV” means the Department of For-Hire Vehicles
149 established in subchapter VI.
150 “(11) "Director" means the Director of the Department of For-Hire Vehicles.
151 “(12) “Dispatch service” shall have the meaning set forth in § 47-2891.01.
152 “(13) “Digital dispatch” means any online-enabled application, software, website
153 or system that facilitates pre-arranged for-hire passenger trips.
154 “(14) “Dispatch service provider” means a person providing dispatch service as
155 defined in § 47-2891.01.
156 “(15) “Fare” means the total value charged to a passenger for a trip.
157 “(16) “Fare modifier” means a cost or multiplier added to a base fare for a pre-
158 arranged trip, including surge pricing, multipliers for periods of high customer demand or low
159 operator availability, and other fees added by a dispatch service provider or smart meter system
160 provider. The following are not considered a fare modifier:
161 “(A) Electronic payment processing fees; and
162 “(B) Taxes or surcharges levied under this Title.
163 “(17) “In-vehicle driver” shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 of
164 the Autonomous Vehicle Act of 2012, effective April 23, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-278; D.C. Official
165 Code § 50-2351).
166 “(18) “Licensed operator” means a person who holds a valid and unexpired for-
6

167 hire passenger service license issued under to this chapter.
168 “(19) “Motor vehicle” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Section 8 of An
169 Act To provide for the annual inspection of all motor vehicles in the District of Columbia,
170 effective March 15, 1985 (D.C. Law 5-176; D.C. Official Code § 50-1108).
171 “(20)(A) “Operator” means a person in full or partial control of a vehicle used to
172 provide for-hire passenger service.
173 “(B) The definition of “operator” includes:
174 “(i) For a vehicle operated by an autonomous driving system, the
175 person that owns, operates, or controls the deployment of that system;
176 “(ii) An in-vehicle driver or remote assistant, as those terms are
177 defined in section 2 of the Autonomous Vehicle Act of 2012, effective April 23, 2013 (D.C. Law
178 19-278; D.C. Official Code § 50-2351).
179 “(21) “Operator agreement” means an agreement enter into between an operator
180 and a dispatch service provider or smart meter system provider, pursuant to § 47-2891.05.
181 “(22) “Owner” means the person that holds legal title to a vehicle. If a vehicle is
182 the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease with right of purchase upon
183 performance of the condition stated in the agreement and with an immediate right of possession
184 vested in the conditional vendee or lessee, or if a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession,
185 the conditional vendee, lessee, or mortgagor shall be considered the owner for the purpose of this
186 chapter.
187 “(23) “Passenger” means any individual who is transported or is to be transported
188 by means of any for-hire passenger service.
189 “(24) “Response time” means the time between a customer requesting a pre-
7

190 arranged trip and the dispatched vehicle arriving at the requested passenger pick-up location.
191 “(25) “Smart meter” means an instrument or device by which a fare is measured
192 or calculated in real time and fulfills the requirements of § 47-2891.04.
193 “(26) “Street hail rate structure” means the rates, fares, charges, and
194 methodologies used to determine the price of street hail service, as established by the
195 Department.
196 “(27) “Taxi stand” means a designated area on a street or other publicly-
197 accessible space where a street hail vehicle may park and be available to accept trips for hire.
198 “(28) “Trip” means a single instance of for-hire passenger service provided in
199 response to a single request for service, from acceptance of request through fulfillment or
200 cancellation, including operation of the vehicle en route to the passenger, regardless of the
201 number of passengers transported and the number of stops made.
202 “(29) “Registered vehicle” means a vehicle registered by the Department pursuant
203 to § 47-2892.01.
204 “(30) “Street hail” means the classification of for-hire passenger service as
205 defined in § 47-2890.03.
206 “(31) "Trade dress" means a unique marketing logo, insignia, or emblem for
207 display on a vehicle that identifies, distinguishes, and is substantially inseparable from the source
208 of a product or service, using a specific style to differentiate from competitors.
209 “(32) “Vehicle” shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2(17) of the
210 District of Columbia Traffic Act, 1925, approved March 3, 1925 (43 Stat. 1119; D.C. Official
211 Code § 50-2201.01(17)).
212 “(33) “Vehicle fleet provider” means a person or association engaged in the
8

213 business of owning [3] or more vehicles for the purposes of providing for-hire passenger service.
214 “(34) “Vehicle inspection officer” or “VIO” means an enforcement officer
215 employed by DFHV, as established in § 47-2896.02.
216 “(35) “Wheelchair-accessible vehicle” or “WAV” means a vehicle compliant with
217 the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, approved July 26, 1990 (104 Stat. 328; 42 U.S.C. §
218 12101 et seq.) that accommodates a passenger using a wheelchair or other personal mobility
219 device and requires a ramp or lift to enter or exit the vehicle. The vehicle must comply with the
220 provisions of 49 C.F.R. Part 38.1 - 38.39.
221 “(36) “WAV passenger” means a passenger provided with for-hire passenger
222 service wherein:
223 “(A) For pre-arranged trips, a wheelchair-accessible vehicle is requested
224 by the customer; or
225 “(B) For street hail trips, at the passenger requires a wheelchair-accessible.
226 “(37) “Wheelchair-accessible vehicle trip” or “WAV trip” means a trip provided
227 to a WAV passenger by a wheelchair-accessible vehicle.
228 “§ 47-2890.02. For-hire passenger service defined.
229 “(a) For the purposes of this chapter, “for-hire passenger service” means the provision of
230 transportation of one or more passengers from one location to another, where the trip originates
231 in, terminates in, or travels through the District of Columbia, including:
232 “(1) The operation or direction of a vehicle while available to provide for-hire
233 passenger service;
234 “(2) Operating a vehicle while en route to a passenger.
235 “(b) The definition of for-hire passenger service includes, but is not limited to, any of the
9

236 following:
237 “(1) The coordination or dispatch of for-hire passenger vehicles;
238 “(2) The provision of dispatch service, as defined in § 47-2891.01;
239 “(3) Pre-arranged and street hail service, as defined in § 47-2891.03;
240 “(4) Non-emergency medical transportation not otherwise regulated by another
241 subordinate agency of the District;
242 “(5) Pedicab service;
243 “(6) Taxicab service, as that term is defined in the Washington Metropolitan Area
244 Transit Regulation Compact (D.C. Official Code § 9-1103.01);
245 “(7) Trips provided by a vehicle operated in whole or in part by an autonomous
246 driving system;
247 “(8) A trip paid for, in whole or in part, by a person who is not the passenger, or
248 another third party;
249 “(9) Promotional or complimentary rides provided by a dispatch service provider,
250 operator, or another party;
251 “(10) Operating or directing a vehicle while available to provide, or en route to
252 provide, a service listed in this subsection.
253 “(c) The definition of for-hire passenger service does not include:
254 “(1) Transportation provided by a vehicle with a passenger capacity of 10 or
255 more, exclusive of a driver.
256 “(2) Carpooling;
257 “(3) A charitable passenger service;
258 “(4) Trips provided by a vehicle owned or operated by a state or local
10

259 government, or a subdivision or instrumentality thereof, to transport school children, their
260 teachers, or escorts to the District of Columbia from the state in which their school is located;
261 “(5) Vehicles and trips regulated by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit
262 Commission;
263 “(6) Vehicles and trips provided by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit
264 Authority;
265 “(7) A vehicle used exclusively for funeral purposes;
266 “(8) Operating or directing a vehicle while available to provide, or en route to
267 provide, any service in this subsection.
268 “§ 47-2890.03. Classifications of for-hire passenger service.
269 “(a) Classifications of for-hire passenger service are as follows:
270 “(1) “Pre-arranged” means for-hire passenger service that is provided as the result
271 of an interaction with a dispatch service, including:
272 “(A) Digital dispatch;
273 “(B) Other means of dispatch, as approved by the Department;
274 “(C) Trips requested on an on-demand basis; and
275 “(D) Trips requested, booked, or reserved in advance.
276 “(2) “Street hail” means for-hire passenger service that is requested, arranged, or
277 provided by means other than a dispatch service, including:
278 “(A) A trip solicited by a passenger;
279 “(B) A trip arranged at a taxi stand; and
280 “(C) Taxicab service, as defined in the Washington Metropolitan Area
281 Transit Regulation Compact, approved September 15, 1960 (74 Stat. 1031; D.C. Official Code §
11

282 9- 1103.01).
283 “(b) For the purposes of this chapter and any other provision of District law or
284 regulations, the term “street hail vehicle” and “taxicab” shall be synonymous.
285 “(c) Classifications established under this section shall be interpreted as subordinate to
286 status as for-hire passenger service. Activity which falls under the definition of for-hire
287 passenger service as set forth in § 47-2890.02 shall be considered for-hire passenger service,
288 regardless of its classification.
289 “(d) Activity that does not clearly fall within the classifications set forth in this section
290 shall still be considered for-hire passenger service if the activity meets the definition set forth in
291 § 47-2890.02 and shall be subject to all requirements and prohibitions thereof.
292 “§ 47-2890.04. Emerging markets.
293 “(a) Notwithstanding § 47-2890.03, the Department may prescribe by rule the
294 implementation of a discrete licensing program for an emerging for-hire passenger service model
295 that does not fit within the parameters of this chapter.
296 “(b) The Department shall determine whether a proposed activity is an emerging for-hire
297 passenger service model that falls outside the parameters of any existing license under this
298 chapter, and whether the proposed activity presents potential risks to the public health, safety,
299 and welfare such that, for the protection of the public, the activity must be regulated and
300 licensed.
301 “(c) The Department may grant an applicant an emerging for-hire industry service license
302 on a provisional basis, which may be renewed annually for a maximum of two years, after which
303 the license shall expire.
304 “(d)(1) A license issued pursuant to this section shall be a personal privilege and not
12

305 property, and shall not be transferrable to another location, person, or entity.
306 “(2) The Department shall require proof of good standing pursuant to § 29-102.08
307 of an applicant for a license pursuant to this subchapter and may, in addition, require certification
308 that the Citywide Clean Hands Database indicates that the proposed licensee is current with its
309 District taxes and any surcharges applicable to for-hire passenger service trips.
310 “(e)(1) The Department may attach conditions to the emerging for-hire industry license as
311 are reasonably required to protect the public health, safety, labor harmony, and welfare from
312 risks including:
313 “(A) Public health;
314 “(B) Public safety;
315 “(C) Consumer protection;
316 “(D) Increased demand on public services;
317 “(E) Environmental impacts; or
318 “(F) Vehicle traffic or congestion.
319 “(2) Such conditions may include a required data-sharing agreement and other
320 reporting requirements.
321 “(3) The Department may attach any such conditions when the license is issued,
322 or may attach, remove, or modify conditions at any time during the term of the license, upon
323 reasonable notice to the licensee.
324 “(f) The Department may determine at any time during the term of the license that the
325 licensed activity as conducted presents an unreasonable risk to public health, safety, or
326 transportation operations that cannot be mitigated, and may summarily revoke the license with or
327 without prior notice. If a license is revoked, the licensee shall be given the opportunity to appear
13

328 before the Department for an informal hearing to introduce any evidence to appeal the revocation
329 before the revocation is effective, or no later than 10 days after the revocation is effective. The
330 Department shall render a final decision affirming or reversing the revocation within three
331 business days after the conclusion of the hearing.
332 “(g) If the Department determines that an emerging for-hire industry model that has been
333 issued a license under this section should be regulated on a permanent basis, the Department
334 shall convey the determination to Council prior to the expiration of the license.
335 “(h)(1) Any rule issued under authority granted in this section shall be subject to a 45-day
336 period of Council review, excluding days of Council recess.
337 “(2) The Council may approve the proposed regulations in whole or in part. If the
338 Council has not approved the regulations upon expiration of the 45-day review period, the
339 regulations shall be deemed approved.
340 “§ 47-2890.05. Reciprocal agreements.
341 The Department is authorized to establish and terminate reciprocal agreements allowing
342 operators, vehicles, or dispatch services authorized in another jurisdiction to provide for-hire
343 vehicle service in the District, subject to requirements of the agreement.
344 “§ 47-2890.06. Insurance.
345 “(a) Except as otherwise provided, any motor vehicle used to provide for-hire passenger
346 service shall be subject to the requirements of this section.
347 “(1) The requirements of this section shall not apply to pedicabs, motorized
348 bicycles, as that term is defined in section 2(11A) of the District of Columbia Traffic Act, 1925,
349 approved March 3, 1925 (43 Stat. 1119; D.C. Official Code § 50-2201.02(11A)), or a vehicle
350 equipped with a motor incapable of propelling the vehicle at a speed of more than 20 miles per
14

351 hour on level ground.
352 “(2) The requirements of this subsection shall apply:
353 “(A) At all times while a vehicle is providing for-hire passenger service,
354 including while en route to a passenger;
355 “(B) For pre-arranged service, at any time an operator is available to
356 accept a trip from a dispatch service provider, including being logged in and available on digital
357 dispatch; and;
358 “(C) For street hail service, while the vehicle roof light indicates that the
359 vehicle is available for-hire, the vehicle is stopped at a taxi stand, or the operator is otherwise
360 available to accept a street hail trip request.
361 “(b) Coverage required under this section may be satisfied by an insurance policy
362 maintained by:
363 “(1) An operator;
364 “(2) A vehicle owner;
365 “(3) A dispatch service provider;
366 “(4) A vehicle fleet provider; or
367 “(5) Any combination thereof.
368 “(c) The Department shall establish procedures for the submission, v
369 “(d)(1) Except as otherwise provided, for-hire passenger service subject to this subsection
370 shall be covered by a bond or policy of liability insurance with the following minimum coverage:
371 “(A) A least $2 million per occurrence for incidents involving a for-hire
372 passenger operator or vehicle;
373 “(B) Uninsured motorist coverage and underinsured motorist coverage of
15

374 at least $1 million per occurrence for incidents involving a for-hire passenger operator or vehicle.
375 “(2) Starting 10 years from the effective date of this section, and every 10 years
376 thereafter, the minimum coverage requirements established in this subsection shall be adjusted to
377 account for inflation, as determined by the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.
378 “(e) Insurers providing motor vehicle insurance coverage under this section shall have the
379 exclusive duty to defend any liability claim, including any claim against an operator, arising
380 from an incident occurring within the time periods specified in this section. Neither the operator
381 nor the vehicle owner’s personal automobile insurance policy shall have the duty to defend or
382 indemnify the operator’s activities when providing for-hire passenger service, unless the policy
383 expressly provides otherwise for the period of time to which this section is applicable or the
384 policy contains an amendment or endorsement to provide that coverage.
385 “(f) Coverage under an insurance policy required by this section shall not be dependent
386 on a personal automobile insurance policy first denying a claim, nor shall a personal automobile
387 insurance policy be required to first deny a claim.
388 “(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a personal automobile insurance
389 policy to provide primary or excess coverage.
390 “(h) The department shall establish procedures for verification and maintenance of a
391 record of liability coverage for all vehicles providing for-hire passenger service in the District.
392 “(1) An agreement between an operator and dispatch service provider or smart
393 meter provider or any other attestation that does not include evidence of coverage, may not be
394 used to verify compliance with the requirements of this section.
395 “(j) A dispatch service provider shall not allow an operator to accept a trip request by any
396 means of dispatch until the dispatch service provider verifies that the vehicle maintains insurance
16

397 required under this section. If insurance maintained by an operator to fulfill the insurance
398 requirements of this section has lapsed or ceased to exist, the dispatch service provider shall
399 provide the coverage required by this section beginning with the first dollar of a claim.
400 “(k) A dispatch service provider that purchases insurance on an operator’s behalf under
401 this section shall disclose in writing to the operator, as part of its agreement with the operator:
402 “(2) The insurance coverage and limits of liability provided while the operator is
403 available to pick up passengers; and
404 “(3) That the operator’s personal automobile insurance policy may not provide
405 coverage, including collision physical damage coverage, comprehensive physical damage
406 coverage, uninsured and underinsured motorist coverage, or medical payments coverage because
407 the operator uses a vehicle to provide for-hire passenger service.
408 “(l) No contract, receipt, rule, or regulation shall exempt any dispatch service provider
409 from the liability that would exist had no contract been made or entered into, and no such
410 contract, receipt, rule, or regulation for exemption from liability for injury or loss occasioned by
411 the neglect or misconduct of such dispatch service provider shall be valid. The liability referred
412 to in this subsection shall mean the liability imposed by law upon a dispatch service provider for
413 any loss, damage, or injury to passengers in its custody and care as a dispatch service provider.
414 “(m) A smart meter system shall not allow an operator to be shown as available to
415 provide for-hire passenger service, whether street hail or pre-arranged, until the smart meter
416 system provider verifies that the vehicle maintains insurance required under this section.
417 “(n) An insurance policy required by this section may be obtained from an insurance
418 company authorized to do business in the District or with a surplus lines insurance company with
419 an AM Best rating of at least A-.
17

420 “(o) This section shall not limit the liability of a dispatch service provider arising out of
421 an incident involving an affiliated vehicle in any action for damages against a dispatch service
422 provider for an amount above the required insurance coverage.
423 “§ 47-2890.07. General licensing provisions.
424 “(a) In the case of licensure by another jurisdiction, a person may provide for-hire
425 passenger service in the District only pursuant to, and in compliance with, a DFHV-approved
426 reciprocity agreement or regulation.
427 “(b) Ability to satisfy the stated criteria for a license or endorsement under this chapter
428 does not establish a right to that license or endorsement.
429 “(c) The Department shall reject any application submitted under this section in the name
430 of a business entity that is not compliant with the entity filing requirements of § 29-102.01. The
431 Department may audit records, or request such an audit from the Department of Licensing and
432 Consumer Protection or the Office of the Chief Financial Officer, to ensure compliance with the
433 beneficial owner filing requirements set forth in subsection (a)(6) of that section.
434 “SUBCHAPTER II. DISPATCH AND METER PROVIDERS.
435 “§ 47-2891.01. Dispatch service defined.
436 “(a) For the purposes of this chapter, a person provides a dispatch service if the person
437 carries on the business of:
438 “(1) Receiving requests for persons to be provided with for-hire passenger
439 service; or
440 “(2) Arranging or facilitating the acceptance of those requests by or on behalf of
441 operators of for-hire passenger vehicles.
442 “(b) In determining whether a person provides a dispatch service, it does not matter:
18

443 “(1) Whether or not the activities set forth in this section are fulfilled by digital
444 dispatch, telephone, radio, or other means.
445 “(2) Whether or not the for-hire passenger service is provided by the operator as
446 an agent or employee of the dispatch service provider;
447 “(3) Whether the agreement or arrangement in accordance with which the for-hire
448 passenger service is provided is between:
449 “(A) The operator and the passenger;
450 “(B) The dispatch provider and either the operator or the passenger; or
451 “(C) Any other persons;
452 “(4) Whether the fare or other consideration for the for-hire passenger service is
453 paid to the operator by:
454 “(A) The dispatch service provider;
455 “(B) The passenger; or
456 “(C) Any other person;
457 “(5) Whether or not an arranged trip, or portion of the trip, is provided without
458 compensation, except as provided in § 47-2890.02(c); or
459 “(6) Whether or not the dispatch service provider operates or is located outside of
460 the District of Columbia.
461 “(c) A person does not solely provide dispatch service by developing, supplying, or
462 maintaining an approved smart meter system or a customer-facing application on behalf of a
463 dispatch service provider.
464 “§ 47-2891.02. Dispatch service provider license.
465 “(a) It is unlawful for a person to provide dispatch service in the District of Columbia
19

466 unless the person is licensed by the Department pursuant to this chapter.
467 “(b) It is unlawful for a person to advertise or in any way present themselves as able or
468 willing to provide a dispatch service unless the person is licensed pursuant to this subchapter.
469 “(c) It is unlawful for a person to accept a request from a dispatch service provider to
470 provide for-hire passenger service, if the person knows, or ought reasonably to know, that the
471 dispatch service provider is not licensed to operate in the District of Columbia pursuant to this
472 chapter.
473 “(d) A dispatch service provider license shall only be valid for the provision of a single
474 digital dispatch system. A licensed dispatch service provider shall not lease, permit, or otherwise
475 allow others to use its digital dispatch system to provide for-hire passenger service in the
476 District.
477 “(e) Unless otherwise provided, a dispatch service provider license issued by the
478 Department is valid for two years and is not transferable.
479 “(f) The Department may issue a dispatch service provider license to a person who:
480 “(1) Submits a complete application, on a form or in a format established by the
481 Department, which shall include:
482 “(2) The dispatch service provider’s standard operator agreement, as set forth in §
483 47-2891.05;
484 “(3) Proof that the applicant:
485 “(A) Is licensed to do business in the District of Columbia;
486 “(B) Maintains a registered agent in the District;
487 “(C) Has secured the insurance policies required under this chapter and
488 any other provision of law;
20

489 “(4) An illustration or photograph of any trade dress established by the dispatch
490 service provider, not including the standard vehicle emblem required by the Department pursuant
491 to § 47-2892.09;
492 “(5) For applicants providing digital dispatch services, a description of how the
493 digital dispatch system operates; and
494 “(6) The fare structure or structures used by the dispatch service provider to
495 calculate fares, as set forth in subchapter V, including a description of any fare modifiers.
496 “§ 47-2891.03. Dispatch service provider requirements.
497 “(a) At all times, a dispatch service provider shall:
498 “(1) Operate with a valid license under this chapter;
499 “(2) Provide service throughout the entire District, unless otherwise authorized by
500 the Department;
501 “(3) Maintain an up-to-date registry of affiliated operators and affiliated vehicles,
502 which shall be submitted to the Department on a monthly basis pursuant to a data-sharing
503 agreement entered into pursuant to § 47-2891.09;
504 “(4) Ensure an affiliated operator possesses a valid license under this chapter and
505 any necessary endorsements, as applicable;
506 “(5) Require an affiliated vehicle to meet all requirements of this chapter,
507 including passing an annual vehicle safety inspection and being registered and insured;
508 “(6) Accept service of general correspondence, license actions, citations, and
509 notices of complaints on behalf of an affiliated operator or vehicle owner, and forward such to
510 the respective affiliated operator or vehicle owner.
511 “(7) Satisfy every request for passenger service as long as there are qualified
21

512 operators and vehicles available;
513 “(8) Establish and enforce a zero-tolerance policy regarding alcohol and illegal
514 drugs, as set forth in § 47-2891.05(c)(2);
515 “(9) Establish and enforce a zero-tolerance policy regarding discrimination and
516 discriminatory practices, as set forth in § 47-2891.05(c)(3);
517 “(10) Record all trips, process all payments, and issue a receipt for all payments
518 through a digital dispatch system or smart meter system;
519 “(11) Comply with data specifications established by the Department pursuant to
520 § 47-2891.09;
521 “(12) Provide dispatch services to passengers in wheelchairs or other mobility
522 devices when dispatching affiliated wheelchair-accessible vehicles;
523 “(13) Allow passengers to indicate whether they require a WAV and connect
524 passengers to those services;
525 “(14) Require affiliated vehicles to operate on a Department-approved smart
526 meter or digital dispatch system;
527 “(15) Provide the following information on its website:
528 “(A) The dispatch service provider’s customer service telephone number
529 and electronic mail address;
530 “(B) The private vehicle-for-hire company’s zero tolerance policies
531 established pursuant to § 47-2891.05(c), paragraphs (2) and (3), and the procedure for reporting a
532 complaint about an operator who a passenger reasonably suspects violated a zero tolerance
533 policy; and
534 “(C) A telephone number or electronic mail address for the Department;
22

535 “(16) Ensure that all information provided to the Department does not misstate or
536 omit material facts;
537 “(17) Inform the Department in writing within seven days if any information
538 provided in the dispatch service provider license changes, including if it ceases to be true or is
539 superseded in any way by new information;
540 “(18) Meet any other requirement as established by the Department by
541 rulemaking or administrative issuance.
542 “(b) A dispatch service provider utilizing digital dispatch shall:
543 “(1) Display the vehicle license plate number and a photo of the in-vehicle driver
544 on the device used to connect with the digital dispatch application, before a trip is initiated;
545 “(2) Ensure that the digital dispatch system not be utilized to provide street hail
546 service unless it has approved by the Department as a smart meter system pursuant to § 47-
547 2891.04;
548 “(3) Maintain all associated websites and electronic interfaces as accessible to the
549 blind and visually impaired, and to the deaf and hard of hearing.
550 “§ 47-2891.04. Smart meter system requirements.
551 “(a) It is unlawful to provide street hail service without the use of a smart meter system
552 approved by the Department pursuant to this section.
553 “(b) The Department shall establish, by rule, a process to approve a smart meter system
554 for use under this chapter.
555 “(c) A digital dispatch system associated with a licensed dispatch service provider may
556 simultaneously be approved by the Department as a smart meter system, provided the digital
557 dispatch system meets the requirements of this section and provides an operator the ability to opt
23

558 out of pre-arranged trips to provide street hail service.
559 “(d) An approved smart meter system shall include, at minimum, the following features:
560 “(1) The capability of metering a trip using an onboard diagnostic connection to
561 the vehicle or the use of location tracking technology, or some combination of the two, to
562 measure time and distance traveled;
563 “(2) An integrated payment and receipting system that accepts cash payment,
564 credit cards, and other electronic payments;
565 “(3) The ability to communicate with a Department-approved roof light as may be
566 required under § 47-2892.05;
567 “(4) An integrated dispatch system that:
568 “(A) Supports two-way communication between a dispatch service
569 provider and operator;
570 “(B) Is able to track vehicle location in real time;
571 “(D) Does not exclusively dispatch calls by phone or radio; and
572 “(C) Provides a duress alarm for the operator.
573 “(5) Supports pricing based on static and dynamic market conditions;
574 “(6) Has the ability to calculate an upfront fare to present to a passenger before
575 the passenger accepts a street hail ride, pursuant to subchapter V;
576 “(7) Is capable of notifying a passenger if a fee for electronic payment, and other
577 known fees, will be added to the fare;
578 “(8) Includes driver authentication and system security features;
579 “(9) Automates data collection and reporting;
580 “(10) Incorporates a mobility data standard as established by the Department
24

581 pursuant to § 47-2891.09;
582 “(11) Is capable of accepting geofencing rules issued pursuant to § 47-2891.10;
583 “(12) Can be used and configured for one or more dispatch service providers;
584 “(13) Is capable of connecting to a Department-approved application
585 programming interface to automate data collection and reporting and allow for the fulfillment of
586 trip requests via third party providers approved by the Department;
587 “(14) If required by the Department by rule, is connected to a Department-
588 approved external dispatch system for the purpose of dispatching wheelchair accessible vehicles.
589 “§ 47-2891.05. Operator agreements.
590 “(a) Before allowing an operator to provide for-hire passenger service or be available for
591 dispatch to provide such service in association with a dispatch service provider or smart meter
592 provider, the dispatch service provider or smart meter provider shall first confirm with the
593 Department that the operator is licensed and possesses all valid endorsements necessary to
594 provide for-hire passenger service under this chapter.
595 “(b) A dispatch service provider or smart meter provider shall enter into a signed
596 agreement with a licensed operator prior to the operator being dispatched trips in association
597 with the dispatch service provider or shown as available on a licensed dispatch service provider’s
598 digital dispatch.
599 “(c) A valid operator agreement shall include:
600 “(1) The means of calculating the amount that shall paid respectively to the
601 operator and dispatch service provider or smart meter provider for the provision of for-hire
602 vehicle service, whether in the form of:
603 “(A) Percentage of a trip’s fare;
25

604 “(B) A fixed amount per trip; or
605 “(C) An amount paid by the operator to for the operator’s utilization of a
606 digital dispatch system, smart meter system, or other service provided.
607 “(2) A policy of zero tolerance for the use of alcohol or illegal drugs, or being
608 impaired by the use of alcohol or drugs while an operator is providing or available to provide
609 for-hire passenger service in association with the dispatch service provider or utilizing the smart
610 meter system;
611 “(3) A policy of zero tolerance for discrimination or discriminatory conduct, as
612 set forth in § 47-2894.05 while an operator is providing or available to provide for-hire passenger
613 service in association with the dispatch service provider or utilizing the smart meter system;
614 “(d) An operator agreement shall not include any provision:
615 “(1) Prohibiting an operator from providing for-hire passenger service in
616 association with another licensed dispatch service provider or approved smart meter system;
617 “(2) Prohibiting a duly-licensed and endorsed operator from providing street hail
618 service or a WAV trip while available for dispatch.
619 “(e) In case of a violation of an operator agreement by an operator, a dispatch service
620 provider may temporarily or permanently suspend an operator from providing for-hire passenger
621 service in association with that dispatch service provider. Such a suspension shall not prohibit
622 the operator from providing for-hire passenger service in association with other dispatch service
623 providers.
624 “(f) Upon receipt of a written complaint from a passenger or customer submitted through
625 regular mail or electronic means containing a reasonable allegation that an operator has violated
626 a zero tolerance policy as set forth in § 47-2891.05(c), a dispatch service provider or smart meter
26

627 system provider shall immediately suspend the operator for the duration of an investigation into
628 the alleged violation of the zero tolerance policy.
629 “(g) Within 3 business days of a temporary or permanent suspension of an operator, a
630 dispatch service provider shall report the suspension to the Department, including the reason for
631 suspension under the terms of the signed operator agreement.
632 “(1) Upon receipt of a report of suspension, the Department shall determine
633 whether the reason for suspension merits further investigation or action by the Department and
634 may suspend or revoke the operator’s license pursuant to procedures established in subchapter
635 IV.
636 “§ 47-2891.06. Operator payment and tips.
637 “(a) A dispatch service provider and smart meter provider shall:
638 “(1) Display to an operator the same upfront fare provided to the customer, and an
639 estimate of the payment to the operator for providing the trip, pursuant to a valid operator
640 agreement.
641 “(2) Remit a fare payment to licensed operators within five business days of the
642 completion of the trip, in an amount not less than the full fare paid by the passenger, excluding
643 deductions agreed to in accordance with § 47-2891.05; and
644 “(3) Remit to a licensed operator 100% of any amount paid by a passenger in the
645 form of a tip or gratuity.
646 “(4) An operator shall be paid the same percentage of any fare modifier as any agreed
647 percentage from a base fare, pursuant to an operator agreement as established in § 47-2891.05.
648 “§ 47-2891.07. Wheelchair-accessible trips – level of service standard.
649 “(a) A dispatch service provider shall have an ongoing and affirmative responsibility as a
27

650 demand responsive system to provide an equivalent level of service to individuals with
651 disabilities, as set forth in section 12144 of Title III of the Americans with Disabilities Act of
652 1990, approved July 26, 1990 (104 Stat. 328; 42 U.S.C. § 12144).
653 “(b) A dispatch service provider shall provide the ability to request a wheelchair-
654 accessible vehicle and shall dispatch a wheelchair-accessible vehicle trip.
655 “(c) A dispatch service provider shall maintain a WAV level of service standard for trips
656 that begin in the District of Columbia such that:
657 “(1) The average response time for a WAV trip request is no greater than [110%]
658 of the average response time for a request of a comparable non-WAV trip; and
659 “(2) The rate of WAV trips requested but not fulfilled is no higher than the
660 equivalent rate for non-WAV trips, regardless of whether a requested trip was not fulfilled due to
661 cancellation by the passenger, cancellation by the operator, or another reason.
662 “(3) The Department shall issue rules to:
663 “(A) Establish data sharing and measurement methodology necessary to
664 enforce the requirements of this section; and
665 “(i) Establish penalties for a dispatch service provider’s failure to
666 comply with the WAV level of service standard established under this section, which may
667 include:
668 “(ii) A monetary penalty for a trip that exceeds the level of service
669 standard and escalates based on the amount of time elapsed above the level of service standard;
670 “(iii) Other penalties;
671 “(iv) For serious violations, the suspension or revocation of a
672 license or other authorization issued under this chapter.
28

673 “(4) The Department may issue rules to modify the WAV level of service
674 standard.
675 “§ 47-2891.08. Maintenance of trip records.
676 “(a) A dispatch service provider and a smart meter provider shall maintain the following
677 information for no fewer than 3 years from the date of the creation of the record, pursuant to
678 rules issued by the Department under § 47-2891.09:
679 “(1) For all completed trips:
680 “(A) For pre-arranged trips, the date and time of the trip request;
681 “(B) The date and time at which the trip commenced;
682 “(C) The date and time at which the trip was completed;
683 “(D) The operator license number;
684 “(E) The vehicle registration number issued by the Department;
685 “(F) The location of the trip origin;
686 “(G) The location of the trip destination;
687 “(H) The distance travelled;
688 “(J) The base fare and total fare charged for the trip;
689 “(K) Whether or not the trip fare was paid for in whole or in part by a
690 subsidy administered by the Department or other third party;
691 “(L) An indication of whether the trip was a WAV trip; and
692 “(M) An indication of whether the trip was operated in whole or in part by
693 an autonomous driving system.
694 “(2) For pre-arranged trips requested and not completed:
695 “(A) The date and time of the trip request;
29

696 “(B) The location of the requested trip origin;
697 “(C) The location of the requested trip destination;
698 “(D) An indication of whether a WAV was requested; and
699 “(E) Any other information as may be required by the Department to
700 enforce the requirements of § 47-2894.06.
701 “§ 47-2891.09. Data specifications.
702 “(a) A dispatch service provider and smart meter provider shall be required to provide the
703 Department with accurate and authenticated data through documented Application Programming
704 Interfaces (“API”) built to the Mobility Data Specification (“MDS”) and Curb Data Specification
705 (“CDS”), as established by the Open Mobility Foundation. The Department may specify the
706 version of MDS and CDS it requires, what API endpoints and fields are required, any additional
707 fields necessary to implement and enforce the provisions this chapter.
708 “(b) To ensure individual privacy, data provided to the Department shall not be shared,
709 published, or disclosed pursuant to public records requests without prior aggregation or
710 anonymization.
711 “§ 47-2891.10. Taxi stands and geofencing policy.
712 “(a) The Mayor may designate a curb lane or other public space as a taxi stand at the
713 advice of the Department.
714 “(b) A taxi stand designation may apply at all times of day or during select hours.
715 “(c) No operator of a vehicle-for-hire shall loiter around or in front of hotels, restaurants,
716 theaters, or public buildings in the District. For the purposes of this section, the term “loitering”
717 means the willful operation of a vehicle-for-hire for the purpose of soliciting passengers by
718 stopping the vehicle or by driving at such a slow speed as may impede or block the normal and
30

719 reasonable movement of traffic.
720 “(d) It shall be unlawful for a hotel, restaurant, or theater, or an agent thereof to prevent a
721 licensed operator in an authorized street hail vehicle from accessing a taxi stand.
722 “(e) The Department shall regularly advise the District Department of Transportation on
723 designating areas of short-term parking to facilitate the pick-up and drop-off of for-hire
724 passenger vehicles.
725 “(f) The Department is authorized to establish geofencing areas and other geography-
726 specific policies on a temporary or ongoing basis, including:
727 “(1) Requiring that a passenger pick-up or drop-off point utilize a specific
728 curbside area within a reasonable distance from the customer’s requested origin or destination
729 point; or
730 “(2) Prohibiting an operator from entering a specific area for the purpose of
731 facilitating public safety or traffic management.
732 “(g) The Department shall transmit notice of geofencing or other policy under this section
733 to a dispatch service provider or smart meter provider by utilizing the data specifications and
734 API established pursuant to § 47-2891.09.
735 “§ 47-2891.11. Vehicle-miles travelled fee.
736 “(a) The Department shall levy and collect a dispatch service provider or smart meter
737 provider a fee (“VMT charge”) based on the number of vehicle miles traveled while a motor
738 vehicle is engaged in a for-hire passenger service trip.
739 “(b) The VMT charge per trip shall be:
740 “(1) The higher of:
741 “(A) 50 cents; or
31

742 “(B) The rate established by the Department pursuant to subsection (c)
743 (“VMT rate”).
744 “(c)(1) No later than [90 days] after the effective date of this section, the Department shall
745 issue rules establishing a VMT rate that shall be certified by the Chief Financial Officer as
746 generating revenue at least equal to revenue certified in the Fiscal Year 2027 through 2030
747 financial plan from taxes, fees, and surcharges assessed by the Department prior to the effective
748 date of this chapter.
749 “(d) The Department may modify the VMT rate by vehicle type to incentivize the use of
750 low-emission and electric vehicles.
751 “(e) The VMT charge levied pursuant to this section shall be in addition to, and not in lieu
752 of, a VMT tax as may be levied pursuant to the Autonomous Vehicle Act of 2012, effective April
753 23, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-278); D.C. Official Code § 50-2351 et seq.).
754 “SUBCHAPTER III. PASSENGER VEHICLES.
755 “§ 47-2892.01. Vehicle registration.
756 “(a) It is unlawful for any person to operate a vehicle, or for the owner thereof to permit it
757 to be operated, to provide for-hire passenger service unless the vehicle is registered pursuant to
758 this section in and compliance with the requirements of this subchapter.
759 “(b) A vehicle associated with a valid commercial AV fleet endorsement issued pursuant
760 to the Autonomous Vehicle Act of 2012, effective April 23, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-278; D.C.
761 Official Code § 50-2351 et seq.) shall be considered duly registered under this section, provided
762 that each commercial AV fleet vehicle is provided with a unique identification number.
763 “(c) The Department shall issue a certificate of registration to a vehicle that meets the
764 requirements of this subchapter.
32

765 “(1) The Department shall assign each registered vehicle a unique identification
766 number and include it on the certificate of registration.
767 “(2) A certificate of registration shall be valid for one year unless otherwise
768 provided.
769 “(d) The owner of a vehicle or a person who has the owner’s permission may submit an
770 application to register the vehicle in a form provided by the Department. An application for
771 registration or re-registration shall include:
772 “(1) Vehicle information including the make, model, year, engine type, and
773 vehicle identification number;
774 “(2) License plate number;
775 “(3) For-hire identification number, if previously provided by the Department;
776 “(4) Proof that the vehicle is compliant with the safety inspection requirements
777 established in § 47-2892.03; and
778 “(5) If the applicant is not the owner of the vehicle, the name and contact
779 information of the owner and a signed statement confirming the owner’s authorization for the
780 applicant to register the vehicle.
781 “§ 47-2892.02. Uniform vehicle requirements.
782 “(a) The requirements of this section shall apply to all vehicles providing for-hire
783 passenger service, regardless of classification, unless otherwise provided.
784 “(b) It shall be unlawful for a person to register a vehicle, operate a vehicle, or permit the
785 operation of a vehicle of which the person is the owner, to provide for-hire passenger service
786 unless the vehicle meets the requirements set forth in this section.
787 “(c) Unless otherwise provided, a registered for-hire vehicle shall:
33

788 “(1) Have manufacturer’s rated seating capacity of 9 persons or fewer, including
789 the operator;
790 “(2) Meet applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards for vehicles of its
791 size, type, and proposed use;
792 “(3) Not be equipped with anything that may be used to shield the operator from
793 observation from outside the vehicle, including shades, curtains, and after-market tint on
794 windshields and windows;
795 “(4) Not be eligible for immobilization or impoundment due to assessed vehicle
796 points or other criteria established in the Parking Enforcement Modernization Act of 2025,
797 effective May 2, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-325; D.C. Official Code § 50-2431 et seq.);
798 “(5) Meets any other criteria established by the Department, by rule, that provide
799 a minimum acceptable standard for passenger and public safety, accessibility, environmental
800 sustainability, and customer satisfaction. Such rules may include vehicle age and milage, or an
801 alternative performance-based standard, as feasible.
802 “(d) An owner shall notify the Department of any substantial change in vehicle
803 conditions, including a change in vehicle identification tags.
804 “(e) The Department shall summarily suspend or revoke a vehicle’s certificate of
805 registration if the vehicle fails a vehicle safety inspection or the Director determines that a
806 violation of this chapter is an immediate safety hazard and suspension or revocation is necessary
807 to prevent a clear, substantial, and imminent hazard to life, safety, or property.
808 “§ 47-2892.03. Vehicle safety inspection.
809 “(a) The Department shall issue rules establishing an annual uniform vehicle safety
810 inspection as a condition of issuing a certificate of registration under § 47-2892.01.
34

811 “(1) A uniform safety inspection may be conducted by the Department, the
812 Department of Motor Vehicles, by a mechanic in the District with a valid license under § 47-
813 2851.03(a)(11), a vehicle fleet provider approved by the Department to conduct inspections, or
814 an inspection station authorized by the State of Maryland or the Commonwealth of Virginia to
815 perform vehicle safety inspections.
816 “(2) An initial safety inspection need not be conducted if the motor vehicle used
817 for service is compliant with an annual state-required safety inspection.
818 “(b) A vehicle affiliated with a valid commercial AV fleet endorsement shall be
819 considered as fulfilling the requirements of this section.
820 “(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt a vehicle from inspection by a
821 vehicle inspection officer or other law enforcement official.
822 “§ 47-2892.05. Requirements of street hail vehicles.
823 “(a) It shall be unlawful for a person to operate a vehicle, or for the owner thereof to
824 permit it to be operated, to provide a street hail trip unless the vehicle meets the requirements of
825 this section, in addition to the requirements of § 47-2892.02.
826 “(b) A street hail vehicle shall be clearly identifiable as such while in operation,
827 including:
828 “(1) A roof light, approved by the Department, that identifies when the vehicle is
829 occupied, on-call, off-duty, or available to accept a fare;
830 “(2) Clear display of the vehicle registration number issued by the Department, in
831 a location determined by the Department;
832 “(3) Display of the operator’s street hail endorsement in a location visible to a
833 passenger inside of the vehicle; and
35

834 “(4) A vehicle color scheme, emblem, or trade dress, (“uniform livery”) as
835 established by the Department. In establishing a uniform livery under this paragraph, the
836 Department shall include consideration for:
837 “(A) Clear signaling to the public and passengers that a vehicle is duly
838 licensed to provide street hail trips in the District of Columbia;
839 “(B) Whether the uniform livery presents an undue barrier to entry for an
840 operator seeking to provide street hail trips;
841 “(C) The uniform livery’s impact on vehicle depreciation; and
842 “(D) Ease of enforcement.
843 “(c) A vehicle fleet provider, dispatch service provider, or smart meter provider may not
844 impose a unique vehicle color scheme as a requirement for operating a vehicle to provide street
845 hail service in association with that provider.
846 “(d) The Department shall create a notice to be posted in a conspicuous location in all
847 registered street hail vehicles in clear view of passengers:
848 “(1) A statement that a street hail vehicle must accept credit cards through an
849 approved smart meter system;
850 “(2) A statement that a street hail vehicle shall not operate without a functioning
851 smart meter system;
852 “(3) A statement that failure to accept a credit card is a violation of the law and is
853 punishable by fine; and
854 “(4) The information required for passengers to submit an alleged violation.
855 “(a) The Department may exempt a vehicle or certain categories of vehicles from the
856 requirements of subsection (b):
36

857 “(1) For pedicabs and other vehicles for which a roof light, uniform livery, or
858 other requirements are inappropriate or infeasible;
859 “(2) To otherwise advance the mission of the Department, including the
860 expansion of access to WAVs and adoption of low-emission and zero-emission vehicles.
861 “§ 47-2892.06. Requirements of wheelchair-accessible vehicles.
862 “(a) A wheelchair-accessible vehicle shall:
863 “(1) Accommodate wheelchair and personal mobility devices up to 30 inches in
864 width;
865 “(2) Have a rear- or side-entry ramp or lift that enables a passenger and operator
866 to gain access to the interior of the vehicle upon entry and exterior upon drop-off;
867 “(3) Have safety devices to secure the wheelchair or personal mobility device to
868 the vehicle and to protect the passenger; and
869 “(4) Display, in a minimum of two prominent locations on the exterior of the
870 vehicle, the international wheelchair insignia or other insignia approved by the Department that
871 identifies the vehicle as a WAV. One location shall be on the front of the vehicle or otherwise
872 visible as the vehicle approaches.
873 “§ 47-2892.07. Vehicle fleet provider.
874 “(a) Except as provided in subsection (c), it shall be unlawful for a vehicle fleet provider
875 to allow a vehicle to be used to provide for-hire passenger service without first registering with
876 the Department as a vehicle fleet provider.
877 “(b) A vehicle fleet provider shall register with the Department, in such form as
878 prescribed by the Department. Such registration shall include:
879 “(1) Identifying information of all vehicles owned by the vehicle fleet provider for
37

880 the purposes of providing for-hire passenger service; and
881 “(2) Confirmation that all vehicles owned by the vehicle fleet provider have
882 adequate insurance coverage as required by chapter and any other provision of law.
883 “(c) The holder of a valid commercial AV fleet endorsement shall not be required to
884 further register as a vehicle fleet provider.
885 “(d) A vehicle fleet provider may require that an operator provide for-hire passenger
886 service exclusively in association with a licensed dispatch service provider or approved smart
887 meter system while the operator is utilizing a vehicle owned by the vehicle fleet provider.
888 “(e) A vehicle fleet provider shall:
889 “(1) Maintain records of all operators that have utilized vehicles owned by the
890 vehicle fleet provider;
891 “(2) Maintain a record of all vehicle lease agreements to which the vehicle fleet
892 provider is a party;
893 “(3) Prior to allowing an operator to utilize a vehicle, ensure that:
894 “(4) The operator holds a valid operator license and any other necessary
895 endorsement required to operate the vehicle to provide for-hire passenger service;
896 “(5) Ensure that the vehicle is in compliance with minimum insurance
897 coverage as established in § 47-2890.06; and
898 “(6) Provide such records to the Department, in a form and frequency prescribed
899 by the Department.
900 “§ 47-2892.08. Vehicle lease agreements.
901 “(a) A lease agreement between a vehicle owner and lessee for the purpose of providing
902 for-hire passenger service shall be in writing, and a copy of the lease agreement shall be filed
38

903 with the Department in a manner specified by the Department.
904 “(b) The lease amount charged to a lessee shall not exceed the maximum amount
905 established by the Department, as established by rule.
906 “(1) In determining the maximum lease amount, the Department shall consider:
907 “(A) Vehicle purchase prices,
908 “(B) The cost of vehicle maintenance; and
909 “(C) Any other factors that may impact the market of for-hire vehicles or
910 affect the provision of for-hire passenger service.
911 “(c) A vehicle lessee shall not sublease a for-hire passenger vehicle.
912 “§ 47-2892.09. Vehicle emblem and trade dress.
913 “(a) An operator shall display on their vehicle a standardized and clearly identifiable
914 emblem, as established by the Department, indicating that the operator and vehicle may provide
915 for-hire passenger service in the District.
916 “(1) The vehicle emblem required under this subsection shall be affixed in a
917 location clearly visible as a vehicle approaches and remain visible while a passenger is
918 approaching or entering the vehicle.
919 “(b) The vehicle emblem:
920 “(1) Shall be sufficiently readable during daylight hours at a distance of at least 50
921 feet; and
922 “(2) Shall be reflective, illuminated, or otherwise patently visible in darkness; and
923 “(3) May take the form of a removable device.
924 “(c) The Department may permit a third party to issue a vehicle emblem to operators on
925 the Department's behalf, including dispatch service providers, smart meter providers, and vehicle
39

926 fleet providers.
927 “(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a dispatch service provider, smart meter
928 provider, or vehicle fleet provider to require an associated vehicle to display a company-specific
929 trade dress while providing for-hire passenger service. Display of trade dress shall not fulfill the
930 requirement to display a standard emblem as established in subsection (a).
931 “SUBCHAPTER IV. OPERATORS.
932 “§ 47-2893.01. Operator license.
933 “(a)(1) It is unlawful for any person to operate a vehicle providing for-hire passenger
934 service unless the person is licensed as an operator pursuant to this subchapter and in compliance
935 with the requirements of this subchapter.
936 “(2) A valid commercial AV permit issued pursuant to the Autonomous Vehicle
937 Act of 2012, effective April 23, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-278; D.C. Official Code § 50-2351 et seq.)
938 shall be considered a valid operator license under this section.
939 “(b) Application for an operator license shall be made in such form as prescribed by the
940 Department.
941 “(c) Unless otherwise provided, an operator license issued by the Department shall be
942 valid for two years and may not be assigned or transferred.
943 “(d) While a licensed operator is engaged in or available to provide for-hire passenger
944 service, the license shall be carried upon the person of the licensee or in the vehicle being
945 operated by the licensee, or be made available for display in an electronic format as prescribed
946 by the Department.
947 “(e)(1) The holder of an operator license may provide pre-arranged trips in association
948 with any licensed dispatch service provider.
40

949 “(2) The holder of an operator license is prohibited from accepting, soliciting, or
950 providing a street hail trip without a valid street hail endorsement.
951 “(3) The holder of an operator license is prohibited from accepting, soliciting, or
952 providing a WAV trip without a valid WAV endorsement.
953 “(g) Each license issued pursuant to this section shall be numbered, and there shall be
954 maintained by DFHV a record containing the name of each person so licensed, their license
955 number, and all matters affecting their qualifications to be licensed under this section.
956 “(1) The Department shall make the following information available for public
957 inspection:
958 “(A) The name of each person licensed under the terms of this section;
959 “(B) The licensee's license number;
960 “(C) Any vehicle associated with the licensee in the provision of for-hire
961 passenger service;
962 “(D) Any enforcement action sustained against the licensee;
963 “(E) A record of any criminal conviction of the licensee within the last 3
964 years.
965 “(h) The Department may issue a license to an operator who meets the requirements of
966 this chapter. Application for an operator license shall be made in such form as prescribed by the
967 Department. Each prospective operator shall:
968 “(1) Submit a complete application, or consents to an application being submitted
969 on the applicant's behalf, on a form or in a format approved by the Department;
970 “(2) Possess a valid driver’s license;
971 “(3) Provide a certification of fitness as an operator on a form or in a format
41

972 approved by the Department, provided, that:
973 “(A) The Director shall establish by rule the scope of the examination; and
974 “(B) The Director may at any time require any applicant for, or holder of,
975 an operator license to be examined by a licensed physician if it appears that the applicant or
976 licensee has become physically or mentally incapacitated so that the applicant or licensee is unfit
977 as an operator.
978 “(4) Completes basic driver training as approved by the Department. Such
979 training shall include, at minimum:
980 “(A) All information contained in safe driver curriculum developed
981 pursuant to Section 9a(a) of the Motor Vehicle Services Fees and Driver Education Support Act
982 of 1982, effective April 20, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-161; § 50-1405.02);
983 “(B) Information about the laws and regulations specific to for-hire
984 passenger service in the District;
985 “(C) Information about prohibitions against discrimination in the provision
986 of for-hire passenger service; and
987 “(D) Information about use of emergency procedures and equipment for
988 the operator’s personal safety, risk factors for crimes against for-hire operators, and passenger
989 service standards.
990 “(E) The Department shall issue rules establishing a process wherein
991 approved third parties, including a dispatch service provider, may provide the basic driver
992 training required under this paragraph on the Department’s behalf.
993 “(5) Consents to and clears a background check and driving history check, with
994 ongoing monitoring if available, pursuant to § 47-2893.05;
42

995 “(6) Consents to the Director obtaining other information directly concerning the
996 applicant's past conduct and general qualifications that shows the applicant's ability and skill as
997 an operator and the applicant's honesty and integrity for the purposes of determining whether the
998 applicant is suitable to provide for-hire passenger service;
999 “(7) Agrees to a dispatch service provider receiving, on the applicant's or
1000 licensee's behalf, general correspondence, citations, license actions, and notices of complaints
1001 from the Department.
1002 “(j) In considering an application for an operator license, the Department may consider
1003 any other information that may lead the Department to reasonably conclude that the applicant
1004 will not operate a vehicle in a safe manner or comply with this chapter and other provisions of
1005 law or regulation. The Director shall reject an application if it has a material misstatement or
1006 omission.
1007 “§ 47-2893.02. Provisional operator license.
1008 “(a) Notwithstanding § 47-2893.02, pending final action on an operator license
1009 application, the Director may issue a provisional operator license (“provisional license”) when
1010 the review of an application is anticipated to be longer than two business days. A provisional
1011 license shall be effective for a period of up to 45 days, unless extended by the Director, and shall
1012 not be subject to renewal.
1013 “(b) Application for a provisional license shall be made in such form as prescribed by the
1014 Department.
1015 “(c) A dispatch service provider may submit a provisional license application to the
1016 Department on behalf of an applicant. The application must be completed and signed by both the
1017 applicant and an authorized representative of the dispatch service provider and include the
43

1018 applicant’s contact information.
1019 “(1) An application for a temporary operator’s license shall not be considered
1020 complete unless it includes a background check and driving record check performed within the
1021 twelve months preceding the date of the application. Pursuant to § 47-2893.05, the Department
1022 may require a supplemental background check before issuing a permanent operator license to the
1023 current or previous holder of a provisional license.
1024 “(2) The holder of a provisional license may operate a registered vehicle to provide for-
1025 hire passenger service on a provisional basis but shall not be authorized to provide street hail or
1026 WAV service.
1027 “§ 47-2893.03. Street hail operator endorsement.
1028 “(a) It shall be unlawful for a person to solicit, accept, or provide a street hail trip:
1029 “(1) Without a valid street hail endorsement pursuant to this section or a valid
1030 WAV endorsement pursuant to § 47-2893.04; and
1031 “(2) Without operating a registered vehicle that meets all requirements of a street
1032 hail vehicle as established in subchapter III.
1033 “(b) The holder of an operator license shall be eligible to obtain a street hail endorsement,
1034 which if granted shall be placed on the applicant’s operator license.
1035 “(c) The Department shall issue a physical copy of an operator’s street hail endorsement,
1036 which shall be displayed in the operator’s vehicle at all times while available to provide for-hire
1037 passenger service.
1038 “(d) Application for a street hail endorsement shall be made in such form as prescribed
1039 by the Department.
1040 “(e) The Department may grant a street hail endorsement to a person who completes a
44

1041 street hail operator training, as established by the Department. The Department may establish
1042 rules permitting an authorized third party to conduct a street hail operator training on the
1043 Department’s behalf.
1044 “(1) The Department may establish and require street hail operators to complete
1045 refresher training courses.
1046 “(2) Training courses established under this subsection shall be offered as needed
1047 and shall be taken by operators as necessary.
1048 “(f) The holder of a commercial AV fleet endorsement shall not be eligible for a street
1049 hail endorsement.
1050 “§ 47-2893.04. Wheelchair-accessible vehicle operator endorsement.
1051 “(a) It is unlawful for a person to provide a WAV trip without an endorsement (“WAV
1052 endorsement”) issued pursuant to this section.
1053 “(b) The holder of an operator license shall be eligible to obtain a WAV endorsement,
1054 which if granted shall be placed on the applicant’s operator license.
1055 “(c) Application for a WAV endorsement shall be made in such form as prescribed by the
1056 Department.
1057 “(d) The Department shall issue a WAV endorsement to a person who:
1058 “(1) Completes WAV operator training as established by the Department, which
1059 shall include, at minimum:
1060 “(A) The legal requirements that apply to the transportation of persons
1061 with disabilities, including providing equal access to transportation and complying with the
1062 ADA;
1063 “(B) Passenger assistance techniques, including a review of various
45

1064 disabilities, hands-on demonstrations of how to assist those with disabilities, mobility equipment
1065 training, including familiarity with lift and ramp operations and various types of wheelchairs and
1066 personal mobility devices,, and safety procedures;
1067 “(C) Training with an actual person using a wheelchair or personal
1068 mobility device;
1069 “(D) Sensitivity training, including customer service and conflict
1070 resolution techniques; and
1071 “(E) Overall training in passenger relations and courtesy.
1072 “(e) A WAV endorsement shall have the same effect as a street hail endorsement. A
1073 licensed operator with a WAV endorsement may provide street hail service without needing a
1074 separate street hail endorsement, provided they are utilizing a vehicle that fulfills street hail
1075 requirements under this chapter.
1076 “(1) The Department shall ensure that operator training and other requirements for
1077 a WAV endorsement under this section are comparable with requirements of a street hail
1078 endorsement.
1079 “(f) The holder of an operator license with a WAV endorsement may operate any vehicle
1080 registered under this chapter, and shall not be obligated to operate a WAV, in the provision of
1081 for-hire passenger service.
1082 “(g) The holder of a commercial AV fleet endorsement shall not be eligible for a WAV
1083 endorsement but may provide a WAV trip in a vehicle without an in-vehicle driver, subject to
1084 approval of the vehicle as an autonomous WAV pursuant to a commercial AV fleet endorsement.
1085 “§ 47-2893.05. Background check and driving history.
1086 “(a) All background checks and driving history checks as may be required for licensure
46

1087 under this chapter shall be subject to the requirements of this section.
1088 “(b) In order to pass a background check required under this chapter, an applicant must
1089 meet the following requirements:
1090 “(1) Has no conviction, bail forfeiture, or other final adverse finding, including in
1091 civil suits or administrative hearings, pertaining to any of the following within the past seven
1092 years:
1093 “(A) Fleeing from a law enforcement officer in a motor vehicle;
1094 “(B) Reckless driving or aggravated reckless driving;
1095 “(C) Leaving after colliding;
1096 “(D) Driving under the influence of alcohol or drug, driving a commercial
1097 vehicle under the influence of an alcohol or drug, or operating a vehicle while impaired;
1098 “(E) A crime of violence, as that term is defined in D.C. Official Code §
1099 23-1331(4); or
1100 “(F) A crime directly related to the applicant’s honesty or integrity,
1101 including theft under D.C. Official Code § 22-3211, burglary under D.C. Official Code § 22-801,
1102 or extortion under D.C. Official Code § 22-3251, if the Department determines that the
1103 circumstances of the offense are incompatible with the duties of a for-hire passenger service
1104 operator.
1105 “(2) Has no conviction for any offense committed in another jurisdiction that
1106 includes the elements of any of the offenses listed in this subsection;
1107 “(3) Has no conviction, bail forfeiture, or other final adverse finding, including in
1108 a civil suit or administrative hearing, pertaining to any sex offense or convictions that include a
1109 special allegation of sexual motivation, including convictions for any offense committed in
47

1110 another jurisdiction that includes the elements of a sex offense, within the past seven years;
1111 “(4) Is not listed in the United States Department of Justice national sex offender
1112 public website, and not required to register as a sex offender; and
1113 “(5) Does not have an active arrest warrant for any crime.
1114 “(c) In order to pass a driving history check as may be required under this chapter, an
1115 applicant must meet the following requirements:
1116 “(1) The applicant's driving history has no egregious moving violations
1117 within the past five years; and
1118 “(2) The applicant's driving record leads the Director to reasonably
1119 conclude that the applicant will operate a vehicle in a safe manner in compliance with this
1120 chapter and the laws of the District;
1121 “(d) The Department shall issue rules to allow for qualified third-parties to perform a
1122 background check and driving history check on behalf of the Department.
1123 “(1) The Department shall require the third party to demonstrate competency in
1124 providing accurate information prior and shall include local, state, and national databases, and
1125 access at least seven years of database history when performing background checks.
1126 “§ 47-2893.06. Suspension of operator license .
1127 “(a) The Department shall develop procedures to evaluate the record of an operator’s
1128 license and suspend or revoke an operator’s license for violations of this chapter.
1129 “(1) The record maintained by the Department for each licensee shall contain any
1130 violations associated with the license upon the final determination of liability by any
1131 governmental body charged with adjudicating violations.
1132 “(b) Any procedure for suspension or revocation of an operator license shall clearly state
48

1133 the grounds for suspension or revocation.
1134 “(1) If the license of an operator licensed pursuant to this chapter is revoked, the
1135 person must complete requirements contained in this chapter anew before receiving a new
1136 license.
1137 “(c)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) proposed suspension or revocation of an
1138 operator license shall not take effect until a final decision is rendered upon a timeline appeal
1139 taken by a licensee or, if no appeal is taken, upon the lapse of the period specified, by rule, for
1140 appeal.
1141 “(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the Department may immediately suspend or
1142 revoke a license issued under the authority of this chapter where the Department has determined
1143 that the operator poses an imminent danger to the public. Within three business days of the
1144 issuance of an immediate suspension or revocation under this paragraph, an administrative
1145 hearing shall be held before the Office of Administrative Hearings.
1146 “SUBCHAPTER V. PASSENGER RIGHTS AND CONSUMER PROTECTION.
1147 “§ 47-2894.01. Fare structures.
1148 “(a) A pre-arranged trip may utilize any of the following rate structures, subject to the
1149 requirements of this chapter:
1150 “(1) Flexible fare, wherein the base fare may be calculated based on distance,
1151 time, or both;
1152 “(2) Limousine fare, wherein the base fare is calculated exclusively on the basis
1153 of time;
1154 “(3) Chartered or sightseeing fare, wherein the base fare is calculated on a fixed
1155 rate per vehicle or per passenger; or
49

1156 “(4) Fixed fare, wherein the base fare is calculated on a flat-fee basis to airports
1157 and other point-to-point trips, based on well-traveled routes or event-related trips.
1158 “(b) A street hail trip shall be subject to the street hail rate structure as established by the
1159 Department pursuant to § 47-2894.02.
1160 “(1) Before the start of a street hail trip, a passenger may request an upfront fare
1161 by providing the exact location of the trip destination. Upon request, the operator shall present
1162 the upfront fare, as calculated by an approved smart meter system pursuant to rates established
1163 by the Department. Upon being presented with the upfront fare, the passenger may accept the
1164 trip with the upfront fare, opt for a metered fare, or decline the trip.
1165 “(2) A passenger shall not be charged for declining a trip under this subsection.
1166 “(3) Payment of an upfront fare shall only be made after the completion of the
1167 trip, provided, that a passenger utilizing electronic payment may be required to submit payment
1168 information prior to the commencement of the trip.
1169 “(c) Calculation of a flexible fare may utilize an estimate of trip time based on current or
1170 predicted traffic conditions and optimized trip routing.
1171 “§ 47-2894.02. Street hail and accessible rate structures.
1172 “(a) The Department shall issue rules establish rates, fares, charges, and methodologies
1173 used to determine the price of street hail service.
1174 “(b) The street hail rate structure shall be established for each of the following scenarios:
1175 “(1) Metered fare, wherein the fare is dynamically calculated by an approved
1176 smart meter system pursuant to § 47-2891.04;
1177 “(2) Upfront fare, wherein a passenger is presented with the fare based on the
1178 requested destination of the trip;
50

1179 “(A) Calculation of an upfront fare as established by the Department may
1180 utilize an estimate of trip time based on current or predicted traffic conditions and optimized trip
1181 routing;
1182 “(3) Fixed fare, wherein the fare is charged on a flat-fee basis to airports and other
1183 point-to-point trips based on well-traveled routes or event-related trips such as sporting events.
1184 “(c) At least once every 24 months, the Department shall undertake a review of the street
1185 hail rate structure. The review required by this section shall be undertaken by holding at least one
1186 public hearing, upon notice with opportunity to comment. Within 120 days of holding the public
1187 hearings, the Department shall render a decision on whether a modification or adjustment in rate
1188 structure is warranted, and, if determined to be warranted, shall implement the modification or
1189 adjustment.
1190 “(d) The Department, in the establishment and supervision of the street hail rate
1191 structures pursuant to this section, shall:
1192 “(1) Balance equitably the interest in procuring a maximum rate of return on
1193 investment and labor of owners and operators of for-hire vehicles against the public interest in
1194 maintaining a transportation system affordable to a broad cross section of the public;
1195 “(2) Establish nondiscriminatory rates, charges, and methodologies for the
1196 determination of fares which assure reasonable and adequate compensation and promote broad
1197 and nondiscriminatory public access to transportation facilities.
1198 “(e) The Department is authorized to establish rate structures specific to pre-arranged and
1199 street hail WAV trips.
1200 “(f) Before adjusting rates covered by this section, the Department shall hold at least one
1201 public hearing and publish notice of the proposed change in the District of Columbia Register.
51

1202 The notice shall:
1203 “(1) Establish a public comment period of not fewer than 45 days from the date of
1204 publication; and
1205 “(2) Set a date for a public hearing on the proposed change, which shall be held
1206 no fewer than 20 days from the date of publication.
1207 “(3) In the event of an emergency declaration, the Department may adjust rates
1208 for the duration of the emergency without complying with the requirements of this subsection.
1209 “§ 47-2894.03. Fare transparency.
1210 “(a) All fares related to for-hire passenger service are subject to § 28-3904.
1211 “(b) Before a pre-arranged trip is booked by a customer using digital dispatch, the
1212 dispatch service provider shall disclose to the person requesting the trip an itemized fare estimate
1213 that includes:
1214 “(1) The fare structure, as set forth in § 47-2894.01(a), including the rates charged
1215 by distance, time, or both;
1216 “(2) The base fare;
1217 “(3) Any fare modifiers;
1218 “(4) Fees and taxes, other than costs that are not determinable at a step in the
1219 transaction.
1220 “(c) Except as otherwise provided, it is unlawful to charge a passenger a fare higher than:
1221 “(1) The fare shown on a smart meter at the completion of a trip, plus any taxes,
1222 fees, or other gratuities;
1223 “(2) [120%] of the fare estimate presented to a passenger pursuant to subsection
1224 (b);
52

1225 “(3) The fixed fare, for any trip subject to such fare;
1226 “(d) Within a reasonable time following the completion of a trip, a passenger shall
1227 receive a paper or electronic receipt that lists:
1228 “(1) The origin and destination of the trip;
1229 “(2) The total time and distance of the trip; and
1230 “(3) An itemization of the total fare paid.
1231 “(e) During a state of emergency as declared by the Mayor, a dispatch service provider
1232 shall limit any surge pricing multiplier by which its base fare is multiplied to the next highest
1233 multiple below the 3 highest multiples set on different days in the 60 days preceding the
1234 declaration of a state of emergency for the same type of service in the District.
1235 “§ 47-2894.04. Prohibition on surveillance-based fare discrimination.
1236 “(a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, it shall be unlawful to use
1237 personally identifiable information collected through electronic surveillance technology,
1238 technological methods, systems, or tools, including sensors, cameras, device tracking, biometric
1239 monitoring, or other forms of observation or data collection capable of gathering personally
1240 identifiable information about a person’s behavior, characteristics, location, or other personal
1241 attributes, whether in physical or digital environments, to set a base fare, rate structure, fare
1242 modifier, or other price or consideration for the provision of for-hire passenger service.
1243 “(b) For the purposes of this section, the term “personally identifiable information”
1244 means information that may be used to distinguish or trace an individual’s identity, either alone
1245 or when combined with other personal or identifying information that is linked or linkable to a
1246 specific individual.
1247 “(c)(1) The probation described in subsection (a) shall not apply where a reduction in
53

1248 price is:
1249 “(A) Set based on publicly available eligibility criteria that any person
1250 may satisfy on equal terms, including, voluntarily:
1251 “(i) Signing up for a mailing list or promotional communications;
1252 “(ii) Enrolling in a loyalty, membership, or rewards program; or
1253 “(iii) Participating in a promotional event;
1254 “(B) Provided to a passenger who is a member of a broadly defined group,
1255 such as teachers, active or retired military, senior citizens, students, members of a loyalty or
1256 membership program, or group purchasers, so long as a passenger voluntarily and knowingly
1257 provides information sufficient to identify their membership in such group; or
1258 “(C) Provided to recipients of a publicly-established need-based program.
1259 “(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), any modification of a fare shall be:
1260 “(A) Specified in terms and eligibility criteria that are clearly and
1261 conspicuously disclosed; and
1262 “(B) Provided without the use of personally identifiable information other
1263 than the use of personally identifiable information permitted under this subsection.
1264 “§ 47-2894.05. Accessibility and non-discrimination.
1265 “(a) It shall be unlawful for any person engaged in providing for-hire passenger service,
1266 including an operator, dispatch service provider, smart meter provider, or agent thereof, to
1267 discriminate or engage in discriminatory conduct on the basis of a protected characteristic under
1268 section 231 of the Human Rights Act of 1977, effective December 13, 1977 (D.C. Law 2-38;
1269 D.C. Official Code § 2-1402.31) (“protected characteristic”). In addition to the standards set
1270 forth in this section, discriminatory conduct may include, but is not limited to:
54

1271 “(1) Refusal of service based on the pickup or drop-off location of a passenger;
1272 “(2) Refusal of service on the basis of a protected characteristic, including
1273 refusal of service to a wheelchair user or an individual with a service animal unless an operator
1274 has a documented serious medical allergy to animals on file with the Department;
1275 “(3) Additional or special charges on an individual with a disability for
1276 providing services to accommodate the individual;
1277 “(4) Requiring an individual with a disability to be accompanied by an attendant;
1278 “(b) If an application or digital platform allows operators to rate passengers, it shall be a
1279 violation of this section for an operator to rate a passenger based on a protected characteristic.
1280 “(c)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a street hail-endorsed
1281 operator accepting fares shall stop and inquire of a prospective passenger in a wheelchair or
1282 personal mobility device attempting to request a street hail vehicle whether the passenger wishes
1283 to ride in the operator’s vehicle or, if the vehicle is not a WAV, wishes to have the operator
1284 contact a licensed dispatch service provider to send a WAV.
1285 “(2) An operator shall not be subject to the requirements of this subsection while
1286 transporting a passenger or responding to a dispatched call for service.
1287 “(d) Any person who owns, leases, rents, or operates wheelchair-accessible vehicles in
1288 the District shall:
1289 “(1) Operate WAVs equipped with smart meter systems and maintain the capacity
1290 to communicate with every wheelchair-accessible vehicles operating under its service;
1291 “(2) Grant priority to requests for service from passengers who use wheelchairs or
1292 personal mobility devices and once dispatched to such a passenger, shall not accept any other
1293 fare while traveling to the passenger; provided, that in the absence of a request for service to a
55

1294 passenger who uses a wheelchair, a wheelchair-accessible vehicle operator may transport any
1295 person.
1296 “(e) An endorsed operator of a WAV shall not deny a dispatch request for wheelchair
1297 accessible service unless the operator is entirely unavailable to provide service.
1298 “(f) It shall be unlawful for any for-hire passenger service to impose additional or special
1299 charges on a passenger with a disability for providing services to accommodate the passenger, or
1300 to require a passenger with a disability to be accompanied by an attendant.
1301 “(g) A dispatch service provider utilizing digital dispatch shall allow customers to
1302 designate whether or not they require a wheelchair-accessible vehicle in a customer profile on
1303 the digital dispatch application or platform.
1304 “(h) If an operator accepts a trip request through digital dispatch from a passenger with a
1305 disability who uses a mobility device, upon picking up the passenger, the operator shall stow the
1306 passenger’s mobility equipment in the vehicle if the vehicle is capable of stowing the equipment.
1307 If a passenger or operator determines that the vehicle is not capable of stowing the equipment,
1308 the passenger or customer shall not be charged a trip cancellation fee or, if such fee has charged,
1309 it shall be refunded within two business days.
1310 “(j) It shall not constitute discrimination under this section for an operator to refuse to
1311 provide service to an individual due to violent, seriously disruptive, or illegal conduct by the
1312 individual. An operator shall not, however, refuse to provide service to an individual with a
1313 disability solely because the individual’s disability results in appearance or involuntary behavior
1314 that may offend, annoy, or inconvenience the operator or another person.
1315 “§ 47-2894.06. Underserved areas.
1316 “(a) The Department may designate certain areas of the District of Columbia as
56

1317 underserved areas, based on an established need for improved or additional for-hire passenger
1318 service.
1319 “(b) It shall be a violation of the prohibition against refusal of service based the pickup or
1320 drop-off location of a passenger, as established in § 47-2894.05(a)(1), if the for-hire passenger
1321 service provided by a dispatch service provider, in aggregate, provides lower-quality service to
1322 passengers requesting a trip that starts or ends in an underserved area.
1323 “(1) For the purposes of this subsection, “lower-quality service” means a
1324 pervasive and sustained pattern of any of the following:
1325 “(A) Higher rates of dispatched trips cancelled or not performed by an
1326 operator;
1327 “(B) Longer response times compared to the response times of comparable
1328 trips outside of the underserved area; or
1329 “(C) Higher fares compared to the response times of comparable trips
1330 outside of the underserved area.
1331 “(c) The Department is authorized to establish rules to implement this section.
1332 “SUBCHAPTER VI. AGENCY ORGANIZATION.
1333 “§ 47-2895.01. Department of For-Hire Vehicles – Established.
1334 “(a) There is established the Department of For-Hire Vehicles as a subordinate agency
1335 within the executive branch of the District government with exclusive authority to regulate
1336 vehicle-for-hire and carrier-for-hire service.
1337 “(b) DFHV is charged with the continuance, further development, improvement, and
1338 overall regulation of the vehicle-for-hire and carrier-for-hire industries in the District.
1339 “(c) In addition to specific functions authorized or required by this chapter, DFHV shall
57

1340 have the authority, power, and duty to:
1341 “(1) Establish any rule relating to the regulation and supervision of for-hire
1342 passenger service not specifically delineated in this chapter, so long as the rule is consistent with
1343 this chapter and related to the furtherance and protection of the public interest;
1344 “(2) Promulgate an issuance, instruction, or guidance as it deems necessary and
1345 appropriate to aid in administration, enforcement, or compliance with any provision of this title.
1346 An issuance, instruction, or guidance may be modified or rescinded at any time with reasonable
1347 notice;
1348 “(3) Establish standards, conditions, and requirements of for-hire passenger
1349 service;
1350 “(4) Establish standards for operator and passenger safety;
1351 “(5) Establish rules relating to the enforcement of traffic regulations against
1352 vehicles covered under this chapter;
1353 “(6) Establish reasonable civil fines and penalties for violations of this chapter
1354 and any rule or order issued under this chapter, including penalties consisting of the suspension
1355 or revocation of a license or registration;
1356 “(7) Undertake the investigation of any aspect of for-hire passenger service
1357 operations and practices necessary to protect public safety;
1358 “(8) Audit records to ensure compliance with this chapter;
1359 “(9) Advise agencies and authorities with jurisdiction over public transportation,
1360 public highways, and public space within the District regarding the routing of for-hire passenger
1361 vehicles and the location of taxi stands;
1362 “(10) Advise the Mayor regarding the execution, modification, and termination of
58

1363 reciprocal agreements with other jurisdictions and authorities;
1364 “(11) Provide for the training and oversight of vehicle inspection officers;
1365 “(12) Receive, hear, respond to, and adjudicate complaints lodged against the
1366 vehicle-for-hire industry, including operators, fleets, and dispatch service providers, or refer such
1367 contested matters to the Office of Administrative Hearings;
1368 “(13) Hear and decide appeals taken from license and registration denials and
1369 proposed revocations or suspensions issued pursuant to this chapter, or refer the contested matter
1370 to the Office of Administrative Hearings;
1371 “(14) When determined to be necessary to protect the public interest, hear
1372 complaints and disputes occurring within the industry, including complaints and disputes
1373 between companies, operators, or owners; and, to address industry-wide problems, issue
1374 reasonable rules for the governance of intra-industry relationships.
1375 “(d) The Department may issue orders which shall have binding effect in exercising any
1376 authority conferred by this chapter.
1377 “(e) No license requirement for operating authority shall be mandated by the Department
1378 of For-Hire Vehicles that is duplicative of the jurisdiction of the Washington Metropolitan Area
1379 Transit Commission.
1380 “§ 47-2895.02. Department of For-Hire Vehicles – Director.
1381 “(a) DFHV shall be headed by a Director, who shall be appointed by the Mayor with the
1382 advice and consent of Council pursuant to section 2(a) of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective
1383 March 3,1979 (D.C. Law 2-142; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01(a)).
1384 “(b) The Director shall have authority over DFHV, its functions, and its personnel,
1385 including the power to re-delegate authority to employees, as is warranted in the judgement of
59

1386 the Director, in the interest of efficiency and sound administration.
1387 “§ 47-2895.03. Advisory Council.
1388 “(a) There is established a For-Hire Vehicles Advisory Council (“FHVAC”).
1389 “(b) The FHVAC shall be composed of 11 members appointed as follows:
1390 “(1) The Director or their designee;
1391 “(2) The director of the District Department of Transportation, or their designee;
1392 “(3) Thirteen community representatives, who do not work for the District
1393 government, appointed by the Mayor as follows:
1394 “(A) Two District residents who operate vehicles-for-hire in the District;
1395 “(B) Two representatives of dispatch service or smart meter service
1396 providers;
1397 “(C) Two District residents with experience as a carrier-for-hire operator;
1398 “(D) Two representatives of companies providing carrier-for-hire industry
1399 services in the District;
1400 “(E) Two representatives of the hospitality, food service, or tourism
1401 industry in the District; and
1402 “(F) Three District residents, unaffiliated with the for-hire vehicle
1403 industry, who regularly use vehicle-for-hire or carrier-for-hire service in the District.
1404 “(c)(1) Community representatives shall be appointed for a term of 3 years, and each
1405 shall serve until the appointment of a successor.
1406 “(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the Mayor does not appoint a community
1407 representative within 6 months of the expiration of a term, the Council may make an
1408 appointment for that seat.
60

1409 “(d) No community representative shall serve more than 2 consecutive terms, which shall
1410 not include an appointment to fill a vacancy due to removal, resignation, or death of a member.
1411 The Mayor may remove a community representative for cause. An appointment to fill a vacancy
1412 occurring during a term due to removal, resignation, or death of a member shall be made in the
1413 same manner as other appointments and for the remainder of the unexpired term.
1414 “(e) A chairperson shall be elected from among the community representatives for a term
1415 of 2 years.
1416 “(f) The FHVAC shall meet at least once per quarter.
1417 “(g) The purpose of the FHVAC shall be to advise the Department on all matters related
1418 to the regulation of the for-hire vehicle industry.
1419 “(h) At least once every 6 months, the Director shall meet with the chairperson of the
1420 FHVAC to discuss recommendations provided by the FHVAC to DFHV. Following each
1421 meeting, the Department shall make publicly available all recommendations discussed between
1422 DHFV and the FHVAC, the Department’s decision in response to the recommendations, and an
1423 explanation thereof.
1424 “§ 47-2895.04. For-Hire Industry Service Fund.
1425 “(a) There is established as a special fund the For-Hire Industry Service Fund (“Fund”),
1426 which shall be administered by the Department of For-Hire Vehicles in accordance with this
1427 section.
1428 “(b) The following shall be deposited into the Fund:
1429 “(1) Funds collected by the Department for issuance and renewal of licenses and
1430 registration under this chapter;
1431 “(2) Funds collected by the Department from fees for services it is authorized to
61

1432 provide under this chapter;
1433 “(3) Funds collected from a VMT charge pursuant to § 47-2891.11; and
1434 “(4) Funds from the Public Vehicles-for-Hire Consumer Service Fund or any
1435 other fund held by DFHV prior to the effective date of this chapter.
1436 “(c) The Fund may be used for the following purposes:
1437 “(1) Costs incurred by DFHV, including operating and administering programs,
1438 investigations, proceedings, and inspections, administering the Fund, and improving the
1439 District’s for-hire vehicle industry;
1440 “(2) Establishing fare discounts or other subsidies including for low-income
1441 residents, seniors, persons with disabilities and other underserved or vulnerable populations, and
1442 individuals connecting to public transit trips;
1443 “(3) Grants, loans, or other assistance or incentives to facilitate and accelerate the
1444 adoption of zero-emission or electric vehicles in the for-hire passenger service industry.
1445 “(4) To offset private costs associated with meeting the mandates of this chapter.
1446 “(d) Notwithstanding subsection (c)(1), monies in the Fund shall not be used operate
1447 transportation programs outside the scope of the Department as established in this subchapter,
1448 including public transit or school transportation services.
1449 “§ 47-2895.05. Accessibility Advisory Committee.
1450 “(a)(1) There is established an Accessibility Advisory Committee to advise DFHV on
1451 making for-hire passenger service in the District more accessible to individuals with disabilities.
1452 “(2)(A) The Committee shall include representatives from the following:
1453 “(i) The Office of Disability Rights;
1454 “(ii) The Office of Human Rights;
62

1455 (iii) The Commission on Persons with Disabilities;
1456 (iv) The disability advocacy community;
1457 (v) Licensed operators;
1458 (vi) The Office of the Chief Financial Officer;
1459 (vii) The Department of For-Hire Vehicles; and
1460 (viii) Dispatch service providers.
1461 “(B) At least half of the Committee shall be comprised of members or
1462 representatives of the disability advocacy community.
1463 “(3)(A) A chairperson, who shall serve for a term of 2 years, shall be elected from
1464 among the members or representatives of the disability advocacy community at the first meeting
1465 of the Committee and every 2 years thereafter.
1466 “(B) The Committee shall meet, at a minimum, on a quarterly basis, at
1467 times to be determined by the chairperson of the Committee.
1468 “(C) DFHV shall provide the Committee with reasonable and accessible
1469 accommodations for holding meetings and an annual operating budget, which shall include funds
1470 to maintain a website where the Committee shall provide a public listing of members, meeting
1471 notices, meeting minutes, and policy recommendations.
1472 “§ 47-2895.06. Accessible Passenger Service Fund.
1473 “(a) There is established as a nonlapsing special fund the Accessible Passenger Service
1474 Fund, which shall be administered by the Department of For-Hire Vehicles in accordance with
1475 this section.
1476 “(b) The following shall be deposited into the Accessible Passenger Service Fund:
1477 “(1) A fee of $0.10 assessed for each completed for-hire passenger service trip
63

1478 that is not a WAV trip, to be paid at least quarterly by all dispatch service providers and smart
1479 meter system providers;
1480 “(2) An accessible street hail registration fee of no less than $20 per month
1481 assessed on a registered street hail vehicle that is not a WAV.
1482 “(A) The Department may issue rules modifying the accessible street hail
1483 registration fee in order to incentivize adoption of accessible street hail vehicles; and
1484 “(3) Any penalties assessed pursuant to § 47-2891.07.
1485 “(c) Funds deposited to the Accessible Passenger Service Fund may be used for any of
1486 the following purposes:
1487 “(1) Reimbursement for costs associated with purchase, conversion, or
1488 maintenance of a WAV to be used to provide for-hire passenger service;
1489 “(2) Grants, loans, or other assistance for operators providing or available to
1490 provide WAV trips;
1491 “(3) Subsidy of WAV trips for persons with disabilities;
1492 “(4) Other programs designed to improve for hire-passenger service for people
1493 with disabilities, with an emphasis on improving the availability of WAVs available and
1494 authorized to provide street hail service; and
1495 “(d) Up to 10% of the amount deposited annually into the Accessible Passenger Service
1496 Fund may be allocated to associated agency or administrative costs, including support for the
1497 Accessibility Advisory Committee as established in § 47-2895.05.
1498 “SUBCHAPTER VII. ENFORCEMENT.
1499 “§ 47-2896.01. Complaint procedures.
1500 “The Department shall:
64

1501 “(1) Allow the public to file complaints electronically on its website and through
1502 a hotline. This hotline shall be available 24 hours a day, 365 days a year, and be listed on the
1503 main page of DFHV’s website and in every vehicle registered under this chapter;
1504 “(2) Within 72 hours of receiving a complaint, confirm in writing to the
1505 complainant that the complaint has been received;
1506 “(3) Respond, in writing, to the operator or vehicle inspection officer against
1507 whom the complaint was filed, with a detailed description of the complaint against them,
1508 including the time, date, location, circumstances of the alleged incident, and the potential
1509 penalties, as well as provide clear instructions of the procedures used to adjudicate the complaint,
1510 the rights of the recipient to contest the complaint, and the documents, evidence, or materials
1511 necessary for proper adjudication of the complaint;
1512 “(4) Provide training in the rules and regulations governing operators to all
1513 personnel responsible for reviewing complaints;
1514 “(5) Provide information on its website about the appeals process for complaints;
1515 and
1516 “(6) Conduct annual performance and compliance audits of the complaints
1517 received by the Department, how those complaints were handled, and how those complaints
1518 were used to improve the provision of for-hire passenger service in the District.
1519 “§ 47-2896.02. Vehicle Inspection Officers.
1520 “(a) The Department shall employ vehicle inspection officers (“VIOs”) to enforce the
1521 laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to for-hire passenger service.
1522 “(b) A primary function of a VIO shall be to ensure the proper provision of service and to
1523 support safety through street enforcement efforts, including traffic stops pursuant to protocol
65

1524 established by the Department.
1525 “(c) Nothing in this chapter shall abrogate the authority of officers of the Metropolitan
1526 Police Department to enforce and issue citations relating to for-hire passenger vehicle and
1527 operator requirements.
1528 “(d) VIOs shall undergo training on the rules and regulations pertinent to this chapter and
1529 other related provisions of law and shall undergo yearly performance evaluations.
1530 “(e) A VIO shall only make a traffic stop of a vehicle in the act of transporting a
1531 passenger if there is reasonable suspicion of a violation.
1532 “(f) A VIO is authorized to issue citations for all moving and parking violations
1533 encountered in the course of their duties.
1534 “§ 47-2896.03. Cease-and-desist orders.
1535 “(a) If the Department, after investigation but before a hearing, has cause to believe that a
1536 person is violating a provision of this chapter and the violation has caused, or may cause, harm to
1537 the public, the Department may issue an order requiring the alleged violator to cease and desist
1538 immediately from the violation. The order shall be served by certified mail or hand-delivered to
1539 the person.
1540 “(1) For the purposes of this subsection, engaging in or providing for-hire
1541 passenger service or dispatch service without a valid and unexpired license or endorsement shall
1542 be considered a harm to the public.
1543 “(b)(1) The alleged violator may, within 15 days after the service of the order, submit a
1544 written request to the Department to hold a hearing on the alleged violation.
1545 “(2) Upon receipt of a timely request, a hearing shall be held before the Office of
1546 Administrative Hearings (“OAH”) with the procedures set forth in the District of Columbia
66

1547 Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1203; D.C. Official Code §
1548 2-501 et seq.), and OAH shall issue a decision within 90 days after the hearing.
1549 “(3) If a request for a hearing is not timely made under this subsection, the order
1550 of the Department shall be final.
1551 “(4) If, after a hearing, OAH determines that the alleged violator is not in
1552 violation of this chapter, the Department shall revoke the order.
1553 “(c) If a person fails to comply with a lawful order of the Department under this section,
1554 the Department may petition the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for an order
1555 compelling compliance, or take any other action authorized by this chapter.
1556 “§ 47-2896.04. Immobilization and impoundment of a vehicle for hire.
1557 “(a) The Department of For-Hire Vehicles, Metropolitan Police Department or law
1558 enforcement personnel, or any authorized agent is authorized to immobilize, tow, or impound a
1559 vehicle pursuant to this section.
1560 “(b) Any vehicle for hire being operated in the District of Columbia may, subject to
1561 procedures set forth in the Parking Enforcement Modernization Act of 2025, effective May 2,
1562 2025 (D.C. Law 25-325; D.C. Official Code § 50-2431 et seq.), be immobilized and impounded
1563 if:
1564 “(1) The vehicle is being operated to provide for-hire passenger service without a
1565 valid license, endorsement, or other authorization required to be issued by the Department of
1566 For-Hire Vehicles under this chapter;
1567 “(2) The vehicle is being operated by a person who does not have a valid motor
1568 vehicle operator’s license;
1569 “(3) The vehicle is not registered to operate for-hire passenger service in the
67

1570 District;
1571 “(4) A dispatch service provider, smart meter system provider, or other business
1572 entity associated with the vehicle is not licensed under this chapter or otherwise lacks authority
1573 to operate in the District, and the vehicle is observed providing for-hire passenger service in the
1574 District of Columbia;
1575 “(5) The vehicle does not comply with insurance requirements under this chapter
1576 or other provisions of law;
1577 “(6) The vehicle does not comply with motor vehicle inspection standards as
1578 prescribed by § 47-2892.03 or section 603, Chapter 7 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia
1579 Municipal Regulations; or
1580 “(7) The vehicle is otherwise eligible for immobilization or impoundment
1581 pursuant to section 122 of the Parking Enforcement Modernization Act of 2025, effective May 2,
1582 2025 (D.C. Law 25-325; D.C. Official Code § 50-2452).
1583 “(c) Any vehicle impounded pursuant to this section shall have the vehicle’s for-hire
1584 passenger service registration removed, the vehicle operator’s license suspended, or both, as
1585 applicable, pending a hearing to determine the propriety of reissuance or return of the
1586 registration or license.
1587 “(d) If a determination is made that, at the time of the impoundment, the vehicle was
1588 being operated without a valid operator license issued pursuant this chapter, the hearing
1589 examiner shall:
1590 “(1) Fine the vehicle owner according to DFHV’s rules and regulations; or
1591 “(2) If there has been a prior determination that the vehicle had operated without a
1592 valid license, fine, not reissue or return the license, and bar the vehicle owner or lessee from
68

1593 applying for or obtaining an operator license for a period of 3 years.
1594 “(e) The Department of For-Hire Vehicles, Metropolitan Police Department or law
1595 enforcement personnel, or any authorized agent acting pursuant to subsection (a)(6) of this
1596 section may:
1597 “(1) Direct the operator of the vehicle to immediately remove the vehicle to an
1598 official District of Columbia inspection station for inspection or reinspection notwithstanding the
1599 fact that the vehicle displays an approval inspection sticker pursuant to Chapters 6 and 7 of Title
1600 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations; or
1601 “(2) Tow the vehicle by a tow crane operator to an official District of Columbia
1602 inspection station for inspection. After inspection or reinspection, if the vehicle is determined not
1603 to be operable or no owner or operator is available to arrange transportation of the vehicle to
1604 another location, the Mayor may impound the vehicle pursuant to the Parking Enforcement
1605 Modernization Act of 2025, effective May 2, 2025 (D.C. Law 25-325; D.C. Official Code § 50-
1606 2431 et seq.).
1607 “§ 47-2896.05. Construction.
1608 “(a) Except as otherwise provided, all for-hire passenger service activity shall be subject
1609 to exclusive control, supervision, and regulation by the Department, regardless of whether the
1610 activity is licensed, registered, or permitted under this chapter.
1611 “(b) Enforcement of this chapter and any regulations promulgated by the Department
1612 shall be enforceable by the Department or any other enforcement officer of the District.
1613 “§ 47-2896.07. Fees and penalties.
1614 “(a) The Department is authorized to establish fees for licensing and registration
1615 established under this chapter in order to support the costs of implementation.
69

1616 “(b) The Department may establish reasonable civil fines and penalties for violation of
1617 any provision of this chapter or any rule issued pursuant to authority granted by this chapter.”.
1618 Sec. 3. Repeals and conforming amendments.
1619 [Reserved.]
1620 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
1621 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
1622 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
1623 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
1624 Sec. 5. Effective date.
1625 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
1626 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
1627 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
1628 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
1629 Columbia Register.
70